Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4901
Chronic renal diseases; Department of Health and Human Services program; establish; definitions.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a program for the care and treatment of persons suffering from chronic renal diseases. This program shall assist persons suffering from chronic renal diseases who require life-saving care and treatment for such renal disease, but who are unable to pay for such services on a continuing basis. For the purposes of sections 71-4901 to 71-4905, chronic renal disease is defined as that stage of renal function in which the kidney is no longer able to maintain the integrity of the internal environment of the organism which condition is of a permanent and deteriorating state. Such condition shall include but not be limited to the following: (1) Chronic glomerulonephritis; (2) chronic pyelonephritis; (3) nephrotic syndrome; (4) polycystic kidney disease; (5) Kimmelstiel-Wilson disease; or (6) progressive focal glomemlites such as lupus nephritis. For the purposes of sections 71-4901 to 71-4905, life-saving care and treatment is that care and treatment which requires constant medical attention and frequent hospitalization capable of restoring life or extending life beyond that normal for a person suffering from chronic renal disease.

Laws 1972, LB 1270, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 686.